Utah statutes.
79-3-506.   Report of discovery on state or private lands.

(1)  A person who discovers any paleontological resources on privately owned lands or on lands owned or controlled by the state or its subdivisions shall promptly report the discovery to the survey.

(2)  Field investigations shall be discouraged except in accordance with this chapter.

(3)  Nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a person to excavate for paleontological resources.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

